Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2904 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
Req. No. 12928 Page 1

1. “Extremely low-income household” means a household that has
an income not in excess of thirty percent (30%) of the area median
income, adjusted for the size of the household, as determined by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;
2. “Very low-income household” means a household that has an
income of more than thirty percent (30%) of the area median income
but no more than fifty percent (50%) of the area median income,
adjusted for the size of the household, as determined by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development;
3. “Low-income household” means a household that has an income
of more than fifty percent (50%) of the area median income but no
more than eighty percent (80%) of the area median income, adjusted
for the size of the household, as determined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development;
4. “Moderate-income household” means a household that has an
income of more than eighty percent (80%) of the area median income
but no more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the area
median income, adjusted for the size of the household, as determined
by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;
and
5. “Middle-income household” means a household that has an
income of more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the area
median income but no more than one hundred sixty percent (160%) of
the area median income, adjusted for the size of the household, as
Req. No. 12928 Page 2

dete rmined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2904.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created until November 1, 2028, the Oklahoma
Workforce Housing Commission. The Commission shall be composed of
fifteen (15) members. The members shall serve as follows:
1. Five members shall be appointed by the Governor:
a. one shall be a person living in an urban area with a
population more than one hundred thousand (100,000)
persons according to the latest Federal Decennial
Census,
b. one shall be a person living in a rural community in a
county with a population less than seventy-five
thousand (75,000) persons according to the latest
Federal Decennial Census,
c. one shall be an official serving in a city, town, or
political subdivision in a county with a population
less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) persons
according to the latest Federal Decennial Census,
d. one shall represent an organization that assists
special populations, including, but not limited to,
the elderly, the disabled, veterans, and children
Req. No. 12928 Page 3

transitioning out of foster care, in obtaining
affordable housing, and
e. one shall represent an Oklahoma rural housing
authority;
2. Five members shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate:
a. one shall be a Senator from the majority party who
shall serve as co-chair of the Commission,
b. one shall be a Senator from the minority party who
shall serve as co-vice chair of the Commission,
c. one shall represent a low-income and moderate-to-low-
income population-serving financial institution or a
community development financial institution, as
defined by the Federal Reserve,
d. one shall be an official serving in a municipality
with a population more than one hundred thousand
(100,000) persons according to the latest Federal
Decennial Census, and
e. one shall represent an urban housing authority;
3. Five members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives:
a. one shall be a Representative from the majority party
who shall serve as co-chair of the Commission,

Req. No. 12928 Page 4

b. one shall be a Representative from the minority party
who shall serve as co-vice chair of the Commission,
c. one shall represent a federally recognized tribe in
Oklahoma that provides affordable housing in rural
areas,
d. one shall be a representative from a community housing
development organization, as determined by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development,
and
e. one shall represent a not-for-profit organization that
serves low-income Oklahomans experiencing difficulty
in obtaining affordable housing; and
4. The following shall be ex officio members:
a. one shall be a representative from the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce representing community
development,
b. one shall be an Oklahoma representative of the United
States Department of Agriculture, and
c. the Executive Director of the Oklahoma Housing Finance
Agency, or his or her designee.
B. No member of the Commission shall receive a salary or
reimbursement for duties performed as a member of the Commission;
however, members may be eligible to receive travel reimbursement as
provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
Req. No. 12928 Page 5

C. The meetings of the Commission shall be subject to the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
D. The Commission shall utilize the resources available to
address the needs of extremely low-income households, very low-
income households, low-income households, moderate-income
households, and middle-income households in order to promote a
condition in which suitable housing is available to as many persons
as possible pursuant to rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Housing
Finance Agency pursuant to Section 3 of this act.
E. The Commission shall submit a comprehensive annual report to
the Oklahoma Legislature, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate, and all legislative members of the Commission beginning
December 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2904.2 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency shall promulgate rules
relating to:
1. An initial comprehensive Oklahoma workforce housing
environmental scan and needs assessment;
2. A comprehensive Oklahoma affordable housing annual report
and action plan to be submitted electronically to the Governor and
the Legislature;
Req. No. 12928 Page 6

3. A state plan for long-term expansion of workforce and
affordable housing across the state;
4. An update on the implementation and outcomes of the
investment in the Oklahoma Housing Stability Program created in
Section 2903 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. An evaluation to make recommendations to the Legislature on
policies and incentives to increase the development, inventory, and
diversification of affordable housing; and
6. Any other rules necessary to carry out the purpose and
mission of the Oklahoma Workforce Housing Commission pursuant to
Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2904.3 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund to be designated as the “Oklahoma Workforce Housing Commission
Revolving Fund”, which shall consist of all monies appropriated,
transferred, or otherwise designated to the fund by law. The
revolving fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall be under the administration of the
Oklahoma Workforce Housing Commission and shall be budgeted and
expended in accordance with the provisions of subsection B of this
section for the purpose of improving the stock and affordability of
Oklahoma housing.
Req. No. 12928 Page 7

B. No funds shall be budgeted or expended from the Oklahoma
Workforce Housing Commission Revolving Fund prior to July 1, 2025,
or prior to the approval by the Legislature of promulgated permanent
rules by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of the
Administrative Procedures Act.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12928 TKR 02/25/25
















Req. No. 12928 Page 8